Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Chapter 25. Teachers’ Retirement.

Administrative Code. —

For teachers’ retirement system, see 2 AAC 36.

For major medical insurance, see 2 AAC 39, art. 3.

For appeals from denials of medical claims under the medical coverage provided by the teachers’ retirement system, see 2 AAC 39, art. 5.

Editor’s notes. —

In general, a person’s right to benefits under the state’s public employee retirement systems vests when the person joins the system. Hammond v. Hoffbeck, 627 P.2d 1052 (Alaska 1981). Therefore, former law may govern the benefits of some members of the teachers’ retirement system. The user is advised to ascertain which version of a particular statute is applicable. Earlier versions of the statutes can be found in prior editions of the Alaska Statutes or in the published Session Laws of Alaska.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 92, SLA 2004 (SB 232), making a series of amendments to this chapter to ensure compliance with federal Internal Revenue Service changes that maintain the retirement system as a qualified plan, see 2003 Senate Journal 1722 - 1723.

Opinions of attorney general. —

There is a strong probability that the Alaska courts would find a diversion of retirement funds for other purposes to be violative of the Alaska constitution and would in addition find the governor bound by statute to include employer contributions in his budget. Therefore, it is strongly recommended that any budget submitted by the governor contain the prescribed funds. December 2, 1992 Op. Att’y Gen.

Collateral references. —

60A Am. Jur. 2d Pensions and Retirement Funds, §§ 13-32.

78 C.J.S. Schools and School Districts, § 338 et seq.